Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2024
Retirement system; powers.

The system may sue or be sued in the name of the system, and in all actions brought by or against it, the system shall be represented by the Attorney General.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 11, p. 690;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-451;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 36.